Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 652.1 of Title 60, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Acquire” means obtaining legal title, equitable title,


beneficial ownership interest, or any other controlling interest in


a single-family dwelling. Acquire shall not include transfers of


single-family dwellings through devise, descent, or inheritance or

Req. No. 3471 Page 1


other operations of existing law so long as the total number of


holdings by covered institutional investors does not increase;


2. “Aggregate” means consolidation of single-family dwellings


by a covered institutional investor and shall include consolidation


through a covered institutional investor’s affiliates or


subsidiaries for purposes of exercising common control and


beneficial ownership;


3. “Covered institutional investor” means any corporation,


limited liability company, limited partnership, partnership, or


other corporate structure with more than one member that purchases


or otherwise acquires title or ownership to single-family dwellings


for the purpose of profit. Covered institutional investor shall not


include natural persons, family trusts or estates, nonprofits,


community land trusts, tribal housing or any other housing


authority, foreclosure or deed-in-lieu acquisitions by lenders or


servicers with a mandatory disposition window, or homebuilders; and


4. “Single-family dwelling” means detached homes, townhomes,


condominiums, and manufactured homes affixed to real property.


Single-family dwelling shall not include multifamily dwellings or


new construction inventory held by a homebuilder for first sale.


B. A covered institutional investor shall not acquire,


purchase, transfer, or assign any single-family dwelling in this


state if the covered institutional investor already owns more than


twenty-five single-family dwellings in the aggregate. A home

Req. No. 3471 Page 2


purchase by a covered institutional investor that violates this


subsection shall be voidable at the election of the Attorney


General.


C. No county clerk shall record a deed conveying a single-


family dwelling to a corporate entity unless the conveyance is


accompanied by a beneficial ownership affidavit. Such affidavit


shall identify persons or entities who exercise at least a twenty-


five percent (25%) interest in the property or otherwise exercise


substantial control. The affidavit shall include a public portion


that includes the identification information of the corporate


entity, any beneficial owner names, if any, and how much of the


property is controlled by the corporate entity. The affidavit shall


include a confidential portion that includes the date of birth,


residential address, and other identifying information deemed


necessary by the Attorney General or the person representing the


corporate entity.


D. 1. The Office of the Attorney General shall have sole


authority to enforce the provisions of this section. Enforcement


tools shall include, but not be limited to, seeking injunctions,


levying of civil penalties for unlawful acquisitions, voiding a


conveyance, and requiring divestiture by the corporate entity.


2. The Attorney General may create forms as necessary.


However, no agency shall promulgate rules to implement this section.



Req. No. 3471 Page 3


The Attorney General shall create necessary forms within ninety (90)


days of the effective date of this section.


E. Any person or entity that willfully or knowingly files false


information pursuant to this section shall be, upon conviction,


guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment of up to one (1) year in


the county jail, or both such fine and imprisonment. Bona fide


lenders or insurers that rely on recorded affidavits shall be exempt


from prosecution under this subsection.


F. Covered institutional investors that acquired single-family


dwellings prior to the effective date of this section may keep,


maintain, lease, or sell such dwellings. Acquisitions made after


the effective date of this section are unlawful.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3471 BLB 1/15/2026 12:07:50 PM

















Req. No. 3471 Page 4